src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-nouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1+keZ !!= * @CODE@ 
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GE+Der/nv+GALUAQ+Der/vn:%>g2igaluaq GEGALUAQ ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCerniar IV_r ; !+IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%VCTRUNCker IV_r_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%VCTRUNCker HTR_r_GAQ_i ; !nammakkerpaa
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>%TRUNClerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCleri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNClersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%VCTRUNCkersor IV_r_stem ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%VCTRUNCkersor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNClisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClior IV_r_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnip IV_k ;
+NNGIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnnger XIirXmorf_stem ; !livm 20171023
+NNGUR@C.Num@+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCnngor@C.Num@ IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR@C.Num@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor@C.Num@ HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR@C.Num@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngorsar@C.Num@ DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalup IV_k ;
+QAR@C.Num@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCqar@C.Num@ IV_r ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCa IV_voq ;
+USAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCusaar IV_r_stem ;
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg:@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCt K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>g2a@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkat@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCa@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkani@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ:@U.Num.Sg@%>%VCTRUNCkanissaaq # ;
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCki@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkakka K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCi K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkani K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>put@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>si@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCat@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>tik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkavut K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCkagut K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkasi K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatik K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkat K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkap@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkama@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkavit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCata@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkami@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkama K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>ma K_plur ;
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkavit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCisa K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkami K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatta@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassi@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCata@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatta K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassi K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCisa K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamik K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkamut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkanut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinnut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinnut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkamit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkanit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinnit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinnit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminnit AblVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkamiit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkaniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCaniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminiit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCiniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminiit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>niit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkaminngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkaninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCaninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamininngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>ninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkami@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkani LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCani@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamini@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanni LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkanni LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCini LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamini LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsinni LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassinni LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>ni LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminni LokVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkatut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkatut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkattut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkattut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCatut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamisut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkattut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkattut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCitut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamisut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsitut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassitut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCattut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamittut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkatsitut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkassitut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>tut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ 
+N+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkamittut AeqVb ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCkamik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Ins+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCkanik K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkaminik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Ins+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannik K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Ins+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCkannik K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
+N+Ins+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinik K_plur ; !Z1+kaZ
